Idaho, session 2025, H0255.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 50-2006, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
50-2006. URBAN RENEWAL AGENCY -- AUTHORIZATION -- DISSOLUTION.
(1)(a) There is hereby created in each municipality an independent pub-
lic body corporate and politic to be known as the "urban renewal agency"
that was created by resolution as provided in section 50-2005, Idaho
Code, before July 1, 2011, for the municipality; provided, that such
agency shall not transact any business or exercise its powers hereunder
until or unless the local governing body has made the findings pre-
scribed in section 50-2005, Idaho Code.
(b) An urban renewal agency created after July 1, 2011, shall not trans-
act any business or exercise its powers provided for in this chapter
until a majority of qualified electors, voting in a citywide or coun-
tywide election, depending on the municipality in which such agency is
created, vote to authorize such agency to transact business and exer-
cise its powers provided for in this chapter. If prior to July 1, 2011,
the local governing body has made the findings prescribed in paragraph
(a) of this subsection, then such agency shall transact business and
shall exercise its powers hereunder and is not subject to the require-
ments of this paragraph.


(2) Upon satisfaction of the requirements under subsection (1) of this
section, the urban renewal agency is authorized to transact the business and
exercise the powers hereunder by a board of commissioners to be established
as follows:
(a) Unless provided otherwise in this section, the mayor, by and with
the advice and consent of the local governing body, shall appoint a
board of commissioners of the urban renewal agency, which shall consist
of not less than three (3) commissioners nor more than nine (9) commis-
sioners. In the order of appointment, the mayor shall designate the
number of commissioners to be appointed, and the term of each, provided
that the original term of office of no more than two (2) commissioners
shall expire in the same year. The commissioners shall serve for terms
not to exceed five (5) years, from the date of appointment, except that
all vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term.
(b) For inefficiency or neglect of duty or misconduct in office, a com-
missioner may be removed by a majority vote of the local governing body
only after a hearing and after he shall have been given a copy of the
charges at least ten (10) days prior to such hearing and have had an op-
portunity to be heard in person or by counsel. Any commission position
that becomes vacant at a time other than the expiration of a term shall
be filled by the mayor or chair of the board of county commissioners, if
that is the local governing body, by and with the advice and consent of
the local governing body, including the mayor, if applicable, and shall
be filled for the unexpired term.
(c) By enactment of an ordinance, the local governing body may appoint
and designate, from among its members, members of the board of commis-
sioners of the urban renewal agency, provided that such representation
shall be less than a majority of the board of commissioners of the urban
renewal agency of the members of the local governing body on and after
July 1, 2017, in which case all the rights, powers, duties, privileges,
and immunities vested by the urban renewal law of 1965, and as amended,
in an appointed board of commissioners, shall be vested in the local
governing body, which shall, in all respects when acting as an urban re-
newal agency, be acting as an arm of state government, entirely separate
and distinct from the municipality, to achieve, perform, and accomplish
the public purposes prescribed and provided by said urban renewal law of
1965, and as amended.
(d) By enactment of an ordinance, the local governing body may termi-
nate the appointed board of commissioners and thereby appoint and des-
ignate itself as the board of commissioners of the urban renewal agency
for not more than one (1) calendar year.
(e) By enactment of an ordinance, the local governing body may provide
that the board of commissioners of the urban renewal agency shall be
elected at an election held for such purpose on one (1) of the November
dates provided in section 34-106, Idaho Code, and the ordinance may pro-
vide term limits for the commissioners. In this case, all the rights,
powers, duties, privileges, and immunities vested by the urban renewal
law of 1965, and as amended, in an appointed board of commissioners,
shall be vested in the elected board of commissioners of the urban
renewal agency, which shall, in all respects when acting as an urban re-


newal agency, be acting as an arm of state government, entirely separate
and distinct from the municipality, to achieve, perform, and accomplish
the public purposes prescribed and provided by said urban renewal law
of 1965, and as amended. The provisions of chapter 66, title 67, Idaho
Code, shall apply to elected commissioners, and the county election law
shall apply to the person running for commissioner as if the person were
running for county commissioner. In the event of a vacancy in an elected
commissioner position, the replacement shall be appointed by the mayor
or chair of the board of county commissioners, if that is the local gov-
erning body, by and with the advice and consent of the local governing
body, and shall be filled for the unexpired term.
(3) In all instances, a member of the board of commissioners of the ur-
ban renewal agency must be a resident of the county where the urban renewal
agency is located or is doing business.
(4) A commissioner shall receive no compensation for his services but
shall be entitled to the necessary expenses, including travel expenses, in-
curred in the discharge of his duties. Each commissioner shall hold office
until his successor has been appointed and has qualified. A certificate of
the appointment or reappointment of any commissioner shall be filed with the
clerk of the municipality and such certificate shall be conclusive evidence
of the due and proper appointment of such commissioner.
(5)(a) The powers of an urban renewal agency shall be exercised by the
commissioners thereof. A majority of the commissioners shall consti-
tute a quorum for the purpose of conducting business and exercising the
powers of the agency and for all other purposes. Action may be taken by
the agency upon a vote of a majority of the commissioners present, un-
less in any case the bylaws shall require a larger number.
(b) The commissioners shall elect the chairman, cochairman, or vice
chairman for a term of one (1) year from among their members. An agency
may employ an executive director, technical experts, and such other
agents and employees, permanent and temporary, as it may require, and
determine their qualifications, duties, and compensation. For such
legal service as it may require, an agency may employ or retain its own
counsel and legal staff.
(c) An agency authorized to transact business and exercise powers un-
der this chapter shall file, with the local governing body, on or be-
fore March 31 of each year a report of its activities for the preced-
ing calendar year, which report shall include the financial data and au-
dit reports required under sections 67-1075 and 67-1076, Idaho Code.
The agency shall be required to hold a public meeting to report these
findings and take comments from the public. At the time of filing the
report, the agency shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation
in the community a notice to the effect that such report has been filed
with the municipality and the state controller and that the report is
available for inspection during business hours in the office of the city
clerk or county recorder, in the office of the agency, and at all times
on the website of the state controller.
(d) An urban renewal agency shall have the same fiscal year as a mu-
nicipality and shall be subject to the same audit requirements as a mu-
nicipality. An urban renewal agency shall be required to prepare and


file with its local governing body an annual financial report and shall
prepare, approve, and adopt an annual budget for filing with the local
governing body, for informational purposes. A budget means an annual
estimate of revenues and expenses for the following fiscal year of the
agency.
(6) An urban renewal agency shall comply with the public records law
pursuant to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, open meetings law pursuant to
chapter 2, title 74, Idaho Code, the ethics in government law pursuant to
chapter 4, title 74, Idaho Code, and the competitive bidding provisions of
chapter 28, title 67, Idaho Code.
(7) A local governing body that has created an urban renewal agency pur-
suant to the provisions of this section may dissolve the urban renewal agency
by the enactment of an ordinance in the same manner, and upon the same condi-
tions, as termination of an urban renewal area pursuant to section 50-2914,
Idaho Code. The urban renewal agency shall be dissolved on the date pro-
vided for dissolution in the ordinance and shall no longer be authorized to
transact business or exercise any powers pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter or any other provision of law. Upon dissolution of the urban renewal
agency, title to all property of the urban renewal agency shall revert to the
municipality. The local governing body shall transmit a copy of the dissolu-
tion ordinance to each taxing district affected by the urban renewal agency,
the county clerk, and the state tax commission within ten (10) business days
from the date that the dissolution ordinance is enacted.
SECTION 2. That Section 50-2903, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
50-2903. DEFINITIONS. The following terms used in this chapter shall
have the following meanings, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Act" or "this act" means this revenue allocation act.
(2) "Agency" or "urban renewal agency" means a public body created pur-
suant to section 50-2006, Idaho Code.
(3) "Authorized municipality" or "municipality" means any county or
incorporated city that has established an urban renewal agency or by or-
dinance has identified and created a competitively disadvantaged border
community.
(4) Except as provided in section 50-2903A, Idaho Code, "base assess-
ment roll" means the equalized assessment rolls, for all classes of taxable
property, on January 1 of the year in which the local governing body of an
authorized municipality passes an ordinance adopting or modifying an urban
renewal plan containing a revenue allocation financing provision, except
that the base assessment roll shall be adjusted as follows: the equalized
assessment valuation of the taxable property in a revenue allocation area
as shown upon the base assessment roll shall be reduced by the amount by
which the equalized assessed valuation as shown on the base assessment roll
exceeds the current equalized assessed valuation of any taxable property
located in the revenue allocation area and by the equalized assessed val-
uation of taxable property in such revenue allocation area that becomes
exempt from taxation subsequent to the date of the base assessment roll.
The equalized assessed valuation of the taxable property in a revenue allo-
cation area as shown on the base assessment roll shall be increased by the


equalized assessed valuation, as of the date of the base assessment roll, of
taxable property in such revenue allocation area that becomes taxable after
the date of the base assessment roll. Any increase in valuation due to prop-
erty owned, leased, or used in the operation of a business entity that makes
capital investments in one (1) or more data centers, as defined in section
63-3622VV(2)(f), Idaho Code, after July 1, 2020, in amounts of at least two
hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) in the aggregate within the
first five (5) years after commencement of construction, that creates and
maintains at least thirty (30) new jobs at the data center within two (2)
calendar years after the commencement of operations, and that is located in
a revenue allocation area for which no bonds have been issued pursuant to
section 50-2909, Idaho Code, as of March 16, 2023, shall be added to the base
assessment roll in the current tax year. An urban renewal plan containing
a revenue allocation financing provision adopted or modified prior to July
1, 2016, is not subject to section 50-2903A, Idaho Code. For plans adopted
or modified prior to July 1, 2016, and for subsequent modifications of those
urban renewal plans, the value of the base assessment roll of property within
the revenue allocation area shall be determined as if the modification had
not occurred.
(5) "Budget" means an annual estimate of revenues and expenses for the
following fiscal year of the agency. An agency shall, by September 1 of each
calendar year, adopt and publish, as described in section 50-1002, Idaho
Code, a budget for the next fiscal year. An agency may amend its adopted
budget using the same procedures as used for adoption of the budget. For
the fiscal year that immediately predates the termination date for an urban
renewal plan involving a revenue allocation area or will include the termi-
nation date, the agency shall adopt and publish a budget specifically for the
projected revenues and expenses of the plan and make a determination as to
whether the revenue allocation area can be terminated before the January 1
of the termination year pursuant to the terms of section 50-2909(4), Idaho
Code. In the event that the agency determines that current tax year revenues
are sufficient to cover all estimated expenses for the current year and all
future years, by September 1 the agency shall adopt a resolution advising and
notifying the local governing body, the county auditor, and the state tax
commission and recommending the adoption of an ordinance for termination of
the revenue allocation area by December 31 of the current year and declaring
a surplus to be distributed as described in section 50-2909, Idaho Code,
should a surplus be determined to exist. The agency shall cause the ordi-
nance to be filed with the office of the county recorder and the Idaho state
tax commission as provided in section 63-215, Idaho Code. Upon notification
of revenues sufficient to cover expenses as provided herein, the increment
value of that revenue allocation area shall be included in the net taxable
value of the appropriate taxing districts when calculating the subsequent
property tax levies pursuant to section 63-803, Idaho Code. The increment
value shall also be included in subsequent notification of taxable value for
each taxing district pursuant to section 63-1312, Idaho Code, and subsequent
certification of actual and adjusted market values for each school district
pursuant to section 63-315, Idaho Code.
(6) "Clerk" means the clerk of the municipality.


(7) "Competitively disadvantaged border community area" means a parcel
of land consisting of at least forty (40) acres that is situated within the
jurisdiction of a county or an incorporated city and within twenty-five (25)
miles of a state or international border, which the governing body of such
county or incorporated city has determined by ordinance is disadvantaged in
its ability to attract business, private investment, or commercial develop-
ment as a result of a competitive advantage in the adjacent state or nation
resulting from inequities or disparities in comparative sales taxes, income
taxes, property taxes, population or unique geographic features.
(8) "Deteriorated area" means:
(a) Any area, including a slum area, in which there is a predominance
of buildings or improvements, whether residential or nonresidential,
which by reason of dilapidation, deterioration, age or obsolescence,
inadequate provision for ventilation, light, air, sanitation, or open
spaces, high density of population and overcrowding, or the existence
of conditions that endanger life or property by fire and other causes,
or any combination of such factors, is conducive to ill health, trans-
mission of disease, infant mortality, juvenile delinquency, or crime,
and is detrimental to the public health, safety, morals or welfare.
(b) Any area which by reason of the presence of a substantial number of
deteriorated or deteriorating structures, predominance of defective or
inadequate street layout, faulty lot layout in relation to size, ade-
quacy, accessibility or usefulness, insanitary or unsafe conditions,
deterioration of site or other improvements, diversity of ownership,
tax or special assessment delinquency exceeding the fair value of the
land, defective or unusual conditions of title, or the existence of con-
ditions that endanger life or property by fire and other causes, or any
combination of such factors, results in economic underdevelopment of
the area, substantially impairs or arrests the sound growth of a munici-
pality, retards the provision of housing accommodations or constitutes
an economic or social liability and is a menace to the public health,
safety, morals or welfare in its present condition and use.
(c) Any area which is predominately open and which because of obsolete
platting, diversity of ownership, deterioration of structures or im-
provements, or otherwise, results in economic underdevelopment of the
area or substantially impairs or arrests the sound growth of a munici-
pality. The provisions of section 50-2008(d), Idaho Code, shall apply
to open areas.
(d) Any area which the local governing body certifies is in need of
redevelopment or rehabilitation as a result of a flood, storm, earth-
quake, or other natural disaster or catastrophe respecting which the
governor of the state has certified the need for disaster assistance
under any federal law.
(e) Any area which by reason of its proximity to the border of an ad-
jacent state is competitively disadvantaged in its ability to attract
private investment, business or commercial development which would
promote the purposes of this chapter.
(f) Deteriorated area does not mean not developed beyond agricultural,
or any agricultural operation as defined in section 22-4502(1), Idaho
Code, or any forest land as defined in section 63-1701(4), Idaho Code,


unless the owner of the agricultural operation or the forest landowner
of the forest land gives written consent to be included in the deterio-
rated area, except for an agricultural operation or forest land that has
not been used for three (3) consecutive years.
(9) "Facilities" means land, rights in land, buildings, structures,
machinery, landscaping, extension of utility services, approaches, road-
ways and parking, handling and storage areas, and similar auxiliary and re-
lated facilities.
(10) "Increment value" means the total value calculated by summing the
differences between the current equalized value of each taxable property in
the revenue allocation area and that property's current base value on the
base assessment roll, provided such difference is a positive value.
(11) "Local governing body" means the city council or board of county
commissioners of a municipality.
(12) "Plan" or "urban renewal plan" means a plan, as it exists or may
from time to time be amended, prepared and approved pursuant to sections
50-2008 and 50-2905, Idaho Code, and any method or methods of financing such
plan, which methods may include revenue allocation financing provisions.
(13) "Project" or "urban renewal project" or "competitively disadvan-
taged border areas" may include undertakings and activities of a municipal-
ity in an urban renewal area for the elimination of deteriorated or deterio-
rating areas and for the prevention of the development or spread of slums and
blight and may involve slum clearance and redevelopment in an urban renewal
area, or rehabilitation or conservation in an urban renewal area, or any com-
bination or part thereof in accordance with an urban renewal plan. Such un-
dertakings and activities may include:
(a) Acquisition of a deteriorated area or a deteriorating area or por-
tion thereof;
(b) Demolition and removal of buildings and improvement;
(c) Installation, construction, or reconstruction of streets, utili-
ties, parks, playgrounds, open space, off-street parking facilities,
public facilities, public recreation and entertainment facilities or
buildings and other improvements necessary for carrying out, in the ur-
ban renewal area or competitively disadvantaged border community area,
the urban renewal objectives of this act in accordance with the urban
renewal plan or the competitively disadvantaged border community area
ordinance.
(d) Disposition of any property acquired in the urban renewal area
or the competitively disadvantaged border community area, (including
sale, initial leasing, or retention by the agency itself), or the mu-
nicipality creating the competitively disadvantaged border community
area at its fair value for uses in accordance with the urban renewal plan
except for disposition of property to another public body;
(e) Carrying out plans for a program of voluntary or compulsory repair
and rehabilitation of buildings or other improvements in accordance
with the urban renewal plan;
(f) Acquisition of real property in the urban renewal area or the com-
petitively disadvantaged border community area that, under the urban
renewal plan, is to be repaired or rehabilitated for dwelling use or re-


lated facilities, repair or rehabilitation of the structures for guid-
ance purposes, and resale of the property;
(g) Acquisition of any other real property in the urban renewal area
or competitively disadvantaged border community area where necessary
to eliminate unhealthful, insanitary or unsafe conditions, lessen den-
sity, eliminate obsolete or other uses detrimental to the public wel-
fare, or otherwise to remove or to prevent the spread of blight or dete-
rioration, or to provide land for needed public facilities or where nec-
essary to accomplish the purposes for which a competitively disadvan-
taged border community area was created by ordinance;
(h) Lending or investing federal funds; and
(i) Construction of foundations, platforms and other like structural
forms.
(14) "Project costs" includes, but is not limited to:
(a) Capital costs, including the actual costs of the construction of
public works or improvements, facilities, buildings, structures, and
permanent fixtures; the demolition, alteration, remodeling, repair or
reconstruction of existing buildings, structures, and permanent fix-
tures; the acquisition of equipment; and the clearing and grading of
land;
(b) Financing costs, including interest during construction and capi-
talized debt service or repair and replacement or other appropriate re-
serves;
(c) Real property assembly costs, meaning any deficit incurred from the
sale or lease by a municipality of real or personal property within a
revenue allocation district;
(d) Professional service costs, including those costs incurred for ar-
chitectural, planning, engineering, and legal advice and services;
(e) Direct administrative costs, including reasonable charges for the
time spent by city or county employees in connection with the implemen-
tation of a project plan;
(f) Relocation costs; and
(g) Other costs incidental to any of the foregoing costs.
(15) "Revenue allocation area" means that portion of an urban renewal
area or competitively disadvantaged border community area where the equal-
ized assessed valuation, (as shown by the taxable property assessment
rolls), of which the local governing body has determined, on and as a part of
an urban renewal plan, is likely to increase as a result of the initiation of
an urban renewal project or competitively disadvantaged border community
area. The base assessment roll or rolls of revenue allocation area or areas
shall not exceed at any time ten percent (10%) of the current assessed valua-
tion of all taxable property within the municipality.
(16) "State" means the state of Idaho.
(17) "Tax" or "taxes" means all property tax levies upon taxable prop-
erty.
(18) "Taxable property" means taxable real property, personal prop-
erty, operating property, or any other tangible or intangible property
included on the equalized assessment rolls.
(19) "Taxing district" means a taxing district as defined in section
63-201, Idaho Code, as that section now exists or may hereafter be amended.


(20) "Termination date" means a specific date no later than twenty (20)
years from the effective date of an urban renewal plan or as described in sec-
tion 50-2904, Idaho Code, on which date the plan shall terminate. Every ur-
ban renewal plan shall have a termination date that can be modified or ex-
tended subject to the twenty (20) year maximum limitation. Provided how-
ever, the duration of a revenue allocation financing provision may be ex-
tended as provided in section 50-2904, Idaho Code.
SECTION 3. That Section 50-2906, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
50-2906. PUBLIC HEARING AND ORDINANCE REQUIRED -- SPECIAL RULES FOR
CERTAIN TAXING DISTRICTS. (1) To adopt a new urban renewal plan or create
a competitively disadvantaged border community area containing a revenue
allocation financing provision, the local governing body of an authorized
municipality must enact an ordinance in accordance with chapter 9, title 50,
Idaho Code, and section 50-2008, Idaho Code. To modify an existing urban
renewal plan, to add or change a revenue allocation, an authorized munici-
pality must enact an ordinance in accordance with chapter 9, title 50, Idaho
Code, and conduct a public hearing as provided in section 50-2008(c), Idaho
Code. No urban renewal project, plan, competitively disadvantaged border
community area or modification thereto, or revenue allocation financial
provision shall be held ineffective for failure to comply with the require-
ments of this section if compliance with the section is substantial and in
good faith and administrative authority of both the local governing body
and urban renewal agency does not extend beyond the municipal boundary of
the authorized municipality. Urban renewal plans and revenue allocation
financing provisions may be held ineffective if an urban renewal area or rev-
enue allocation area extends outside the municipal boundary of an authorized
municipality and a transfer of powers ordinance has not been adopted by the
cooperating county.
(2) A revenue allocation financing provision adopted in accordance
with this chapter shall be effective retroactively to January 1 of the year
in which the local governing body of the authorized municipality enacts such
ordinance.
(3)(a) The Prior to taking action on an ordinance to adopt a revenue al-
location financing provision, the local governing body of an authorized
municipality shall prepare a notice stating: (a) that
(i) That an urban renewal plan or modification thereto or a com-
petitively disadvantaged border community area has been proposed
and is being considered for adoption, and that such plan or modi-
fication thereto or proposal to create a competitively disadvan-
taged border community area contains a revenue allocation financ-
ing provision that will cause property taxes resulting from any
increases in equalized assessed valuation in excess of the equal-
ized assessed valuation as shown on the base assessment roll to be
allocated to the agency for urban renewal and competitively disad-
vantaged border community area purposes; and (b) that
(ii) That an agreement on the administration of a revenue alloca-
tion financing provision extending beyond the municipal boundary
of the authorized municipality has been negotiated with the coop-


erating county having extraterritorial power and that the agree-
ment has been formalized by a transfer of power ordinance adopted
by that county; and (c) that
(iii) That a public hearing on such plan or modification will be
held by the local governing body pursuant to section 50-2008(c),
Idaho Code.
(b) The notice shall also state the time, date, and place of the hear-
ing. At least thirty (30) days but not more than sixty (60) days prior
to the date set for final reading of the ordinance, the local governing
body shall publish the notice in a newspaper of general circulation and
transmit the notice, together with a copy of the plan and recommenda-
tion of the urban renewal agency or the municipality which by ordinance
created the competitively disadvantaged border community area, to the
governing body of each taxing district which levies taxes upon any tax-
able property in the revenue allocation area and which would be affected
by the revenue allocation financing provision of the urban renewal plan
proposed to be approved by the local governing body.
(4) No fire protection district or ambulance service district shall be
subject to the financing provisions of an urban renewal revenue allocation
area, or any modification thereof, created or modified after July 1, 2025,
unless the local governing body of the authorized municipality proposing to
create or modify such financing provision requests such district to consent
to be subject to the financing provision and the district receiving such
request consents. To request such a district to consent, the local governing
body of an authorized municipality shall send a request to the district at
the same time it sends notice to taxing districts of its intent to create or
modify an urban renewal plan that includes a revenue allocation financing
provision pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. If the governing board
of the district receiving a request to consent agrees with the request, it
shall adopt a resolution providing that such district shall be subject to
the financing provisions of the proposed urban renewal area plan or proposed
urban renewal area plan modification that was identified in the request, and
shall thereafter be subject to such financing provision. The consenting
district shall, within ten (10) business days, file a copy of the resolution
with the local governing body of the authorized municipality. Upon receipt
of the district's resolution consenting to be subject to the financing pro-
vision, the governing body of the municipality shall transmit a copy of such
resolution to the county clerk and the state tax commission within ten (10)
business days.
(5) Any fire protection district or ambulance service district may
withdraw from being subject to an urban renewal revenue allocation financ-
ing provision at any time if the urban renewal agency governing the revenue
allocation financing provision does not have any outstanding bonds or other
indebtedness being funded by such revenue allocation financing provision.
Any fire protection district or ambulance service district that seeks to
withdraw shall adopt a resolution expressing such intent and file the same
with the urban renewal agency and local governing body of the authorized
municipality that approved the revenue allocation financing provision that
the district seeks to withdraw from. Upon receipt of the fire protection
district's or ambulance service district's resolution approving the with-


drawal, the governing body of the municipality shall transmit a copy of
such resolution to the county clerk and the state tax commission within ten
(10) business days. The district's withdrawal from the revenue allocation
financing provision shall take affect on December 31 of the year that the
resolution approving the withdrawal is adopted, and the district shall
thereafter be entitled to a levy on the equalized assessed valuation of tax-
able property within its jurisdiction pursuant to section 50-2908(1)(g),
Idaho Code.
SECTION 4. That Section 50-2907, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
50-2907. TRANSMITTAL OF REVENUE ALLOCATION AREA DESCRIPTION AND OTHER
DOCUMENTS TO TAXING AGENCIES. (1) After the effective date of an ordinance
enacted by the local governing body of an authorized municipality, the clerk
of the authorized municipality shall transmit, to the county auditor and tax
assessor of the county in which the revenue allocation area is located, to
the affected taxing districts, and to the state tax commission, a copy of the
ordinance enacted, a copy of the legal description of the boundaries of the
revenue allocation area, and a map indicating the boundaries of the revenue
allocation area.
(2) For revenue allocation areas extending beyond the corporate munic-
ipal boundary of the authorized municipality, the copy of the ordinance en-
acted by the authorized municipality shall include, as an attachment, a copy
of the transfer of powers ordinance adopted by the cooperating county under
section 50-2906(3)(b)(3)(a)(ii), Idaho Code.
(3) Such documents shall be transmitted within the time required by
section 63-215, Idaho Code.
SECTION 5. That Section 50-2908, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
50-2908. DETERMINATION OF TAX LEVIES -- CREATION OF SPECIAL FUND. (1)
For purposes of calculating the rate at which taxes shall be levied by or
for each taxing district in which a revenue allocation area is located, the
county commissioners shall, with respect to the taxable property located in
such revenue allocation area, use the equalized assessed value of such tax-
able property as shown on the base assessment roll rather than on the current
equalized assessed valuation of such taxable property, except the current
equalized assessed valuation shall be used for calculating the tax rate for:
(a) Levies for refunds and credits pursuant to section 63-1305, Idaho
Code, and any judgment pursuant to section 33-802(1), Idaho Code, cer-
tified after December 31, 2007;
(b) Levies permitted pursuant to section 63-802(3), Idaho Code, certi-
fied after December 31, 2007;
(c) Levies for voter-approved general obligation bonds of any taxing
district and plant facility reserve fund levies passed after December
31, 2007;
(d) Levies for payment of obligations that have been judicially con-
firmed pursuant to chapter 13, title 7, Idaho Code, and that meet the
criteria of sections 63-1315 and 63-1316, Idaho Code;


(e) Levies set forth in paragraphs (a) through (d) of this subsection,
first certified prior to December 31, 2007, when the property affected
by said levies is included within the boundaries of a revenue allocation
area by a change in the boundaries of either the revenue allocation area
or any taxing district after December 31, 2007; and
(f) School levies for supplemental maintenance and operation pursuant
to section 33-802(3) and (4), Idaho Code, approved after December 31,
2007, and for emergency funds pursuant to section 33-805, Idaho Code,
approved after July 1, 2015.; and
(g) Levies of fire protection districts and ambulance services dis-
tricts that are exempt from being subject to a revenue allocation
financing provision pursuant to section 50-2906(4), Idaho Code, or that
withdraw from being subject to a revenue allocation financing provision
pursuant to section 50-2906(5), Idaho Code.
(2) With respect to each such taxing district, the tax rate calculated
under subsection (1) of this section shall be applied to the current equal-
ized assessed valuation of all taxable property in the taxing district, in-
cluding the taxable property in the revenue allocation area. The tax rev-
enues thereby produced shall be allocated as follows:
(a) To the taxing district shall be allocated and shall be paid by the
county treasurer:
(i) All taxes levied by the taxing district or on its behalf on
taxable property located within the taxing district but outside
the revenue allocation area;
(ii) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (iv) of this
paragraph, a portion of the taxes levied by the taxing district or
on its behalf on the taxable property located within the revenue
allocation area, which portion is the amount produced by applying
the taxing district's tax rate determined under subsection (1) of
this section to the equalized assessed valuation, as shown on the
base assessment roll, of the taxable property located within the
revenue allocation area;
(iii) All taxes levied by the taxing district to satisfy obliga-
tions specified in subsection (1) of this section; and
(iv) In the case of a revenue allocation area first formed or ex-
panded to include the property on or after July 1, 2020, all taxes
levied by any highway district, unless the local governing body
that created the revenue allocation area has responsibility for
the maintenance of roads or highways. In the case of property lo-
cated within a revenue allocation area prior to July 1, 2020, or
property located within a revenue allocation area created by a lo-
cal governing body that has responsibility for the maintenance of
roads or highways, the allocation of taxes shall be governed by
subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph. In any case, the highway dis-
trict and the urban renewal agency may enter into an agreement for
a different allocation. A copy of any such agreement shall be sub-
mitted to the state tax commission and to the county clerk by the
highway district as soon as practicable after the parties have en-
tered into the contract and by no later than September 1 of the year
in which the agreement takes effect.


(b) To the urban renewal agency shall be allocated the balance, if any,
of the taxes levied on the taxable property located within the revenue
allocation area.
(3) Upon enactment of an ordinance adopting a revenue allocation fi-
nancing provision as part of an urban renewal plan, the urban renewal agency
shall create a special fund or funds to be used for the purposes enumerated
in this chapter. The revenues allocated to the urban renewal agency pursuant
to this chapter shall be paid to the agency by the treasurer of the county in
which the revenue allocation district is located and shall be deposited by
the agency into one (1) or more of such special funds. The agency may, in ad-
dition, deposit into such special fund or funds such other income, proceeds,
revenues and funds it may receive from sources other than the revenues allo-
cated to it under subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(4) For the purposes of section 63-803, Idaho Code, during the period
when revenue allocation under this chapter is in effect, and solely with
respect to any taxing district in which a revenue allocation area is located,
the county commissioners shall, in fixing any tax levy other than a levy
specified in subsection (1) of this section, take into consideration the
equalized assessed valuation of the taxable property situated in the revenue
allocation area as shown in the base assessment roll, rather than the current
equalized assessed value of such taxable property.
(5) For all other purposes, including, without limitation, for pur-
poses of sections 33-802, 33-1002 and 63-1313, Idaho Code, reference in the
Idaho Code to the term "market value for assessment purposes" (or any other
such similar term) shall mean market value for assessment purposes as de-
fined in section 63-208, Idaho Code.
SECTION 6. That Section 50-2909, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
50-2909. ISSUANCE OF BONDS -- BOND PROVISIONS. (1) If the local gov-
erning body of an authorized municipality has enacted an ordinance adopting
a revenue allocation financing provision as part of an urban renewal plan,
the urban renewal agency established by such municipality is hereby autho-
rized and empowered:
(a) To apply the revenues allocated to it pursuant to section 50-2908,
Idaho Code, for payment of the projected costs of any urban renewal
project located in the revenue allocation area;
(b) To borrow money, incur indebtedness and issue one (1) or more series
of bonds to finance or refinance, in whole or in part, the urban renewal
projects authorized pursuant to such plan within the limits established
by paragraph (c) of this subsection; and
(c) To pledge irrevocably to the payment of principal of and interest
on such moneys borrowed, indebtedness incurred or bonds issued by the
agency the revenues allocated to it pursuant to section 50-2908, Idaho
Code.
All bonds issued under this section shall be issued in accordance with sec-
tion 50-2012, Idaho Code, except that such bonds shall be payable solely from
the special fund or funds established pursuant to section 50-2908, Idaho
Code. On and after July 1, 2011, bonds may be issued for a maximum period of
twenty (20) years.


(2) The agency shall be obligated and bound to pay such borrowed moneys,
indebtedness, and bonds as the same shall become due, but only to the extent
that the moneys are available in a special fund or funds established under
section 50-2908, Idaho Code; and the agency is authorized to maintain an ad-
equate reserve therefor from any moneys deposited in such a special fund or
funds.
(3) Nothing in this chapter shall in any way impair any powers an urban
renewal agency may have under subsection (a) of section 50-2012, Idaho Code.
(4) When the revenue allocation area plan budget described in section
50-2903(5), Idaho Code, estimates that all financial obligations have been
provided for, the principal of and interest on such moneys, indebtedness and
bonds have been paid in full, or when deposits in the special fund or funds
created under this chapter are sufficient to pay such principal and interest
as they come due, and to fund reserves, if any, or any other obligations of
the agency funded through revenue allocation proceeds shall be satisfied and
the agency has determined no additional project costs need be funded through
revenue allocation financing, the allocation of revenues under section
50-2908, Idaho Code, shall thereupon cease; any moneys in such fund or funds
in excess of the amount necessary to pay such principal and interest shall be
distributed to the affected taxing districts in which the revenue allocation
area is located in the same manner and proportion as the most recent distri-
bution to the affected taxing districts of the taxes on the taxable property
located within the revenue allocation area; and the powers granted to the
urban renewal agency under section 50-2909, Idaho Code, shall thereupon
terminate.
SECTION 7. That Chapter 29, Title 50, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 50-2914, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
50-2914. TERMINATION OF REVENUE ALLOCATION AREA. (1) A revenue allo-
cation area, along with any associated revenue allocation financing provi-
sion adopted pursuant to this chapter, may be terminated either on or before
the termination date as defined in section 50-2903 in accordance with the
provisions of this section.
(2)(a) Prior to the termination date of a revenue allocation area,
the urban renewal agency shall adopt and publish a budget for the fi-
nal fiscal year or years of an urban renewal plan involving a revenue
allocation area. The budget shall specify the projected revenues and
expenses of the plan. The agency's budget for the final fiscal year or
years of the revenue allocation area must estimate that all financial
obligations shall have been provided for, the principal of and interest
on such moneys, indebtedness, and bonds shall have been paid in full,
or that deposits in the special fund or funds created under this chapter
are sufficient to pay such principal and interest as they come due, and
that any other obligations of the agency funded through revenue alloca-
tion proceeds shall be satisfied.
(b) In the event the budget indicates a shortfall in meeting the rev-
enue allocation area's financial obligations by the termination date,
the agency may pursue an annual extension of the duration of the rev-


enue allocation area pursuant to the provisions of section 50-2903A(2),
Idaho Code.
(c) If the budget meets the requirements of paragraph (a) of this sub-
section, the agency shall make a finding that no additional project
costs need be funded through revenue allocation financing and shall
adopt a resolution notifying the local governing body that the revenue
allocation area is on schedule to terminate pursuant to the plan and
recommending that the local governing body enact an ordinance terminat-
ing the revenue allocation area on the termination date.
(d) If the agency determines that a revenue allocation area can be ter-
minated before the January 1 of the termination year because the cur-
rent tax year revenues are sufficient to cover all estimated expenses
for the current year and all future years prior to the termination date,
the agency shall adopt a resolution by no later than August 1 containing
its findings and recommending the adoption of an ordinance by the local
governing body for termination of the revenue allocation area by Decem-
ber 31 of the current year.
(3) The agency shall cause a copy of any resolution enacted pursuant to
this section to be filed with the office of the county recorder and the Idaho
state tax commission.
(4) If the local governing body concurs with the budget and findings of
the agency, it shall enact an ordinance no later than September 1 terminat-
ing the revenue allocation area and stating the date of termination. Within
ten (10) days of enacting such an ordinance, the local governing body shall
transmit a copy of the ordinance to the office of the county recorder and the
Idaho state tax commission as provided in section 63-215, Idaho Code, and
each taxing district within the revenue allocation area. Upon the enact-
ment of the ordinance terminating the revenue allocation area, the increment
value of that revenue allocation area shall be included in the net taxable
value of the appropriate taxing districts when calculating the subsequent
property tax levies pursuant to section 63-803, Idaho Code. The increment
value shall also be included in subsequent notification of taxable value for
each taxing district pursuant to section 63-1312, Idaho Code, and subsequent
certification of actual and adjusted market values for each school district
pursuant to section 63-315, Idaho Code.
(5) On the date of termination:
(a) The allocation of revenues under section 50-2908, Idaho Code, shall
thereupon cease;
(b) Any moneys in the revenue allocation area fund or funds in excess
of the amount necessary to pay such principal and interest shall be dis-
tributed to the affected taxing districts in which the revenue alloca-
tion area is located in the same manner and proportion as the most recent
distribution to the affected taxing districts of the taxes on the tax-
able property located within the revenue allocation area; and
(c) The powers granted to the urban renewal agency under section
50-2909, Idaho Code, shall thereupon terminate.
SECTION 8. That Section 63-301A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


63-301A. NEW CONSTRUCTION ROLL. (1) The county assessor shall prepare
a new construction roll, which shall be in addition to the property roll,
which new construction roll shall show:
(a) The name of the taxpayer;
(b) The description of the new construction, suitably detailed to meet
the requirements of the individual county;
(c) The amount of taxable market value added to the property on the cur-
rent year's property roll that is directly the result of new construc-
tion;
(d) The amount of taxable market value added as provided in subsection
(3)(f) of this section as a result of dissolution of any revenue alloca-
tion area; and
(e) The amount of taxable market value to be deducted to reflect the ad-
justments required in this paragraph:
(i) Any board of tax appeals or court-ordered value change, if
property has a taxable value lower than that shown on any new con-
struction roll in any one (1) of the immediate five (5) tax years
preceding the current tax year;
(ii) Any reduction in value resulting from correction of value im-
properly included on any previous new construction roll as a re-
sult of double or otherwise erroneous assessment;
(iii) Any reduction in value resulting from the exemption provided
in section 63-602W(4), Idaho Code, in any one (1) of the immediate
five (5) tax years preceding the current tax year; and
(iv) Any voluntary reduction in value reflecting a portion of
certain homestead exemptions as provided in section 63-602G(10),
Idaho Code.
(2) As soon as possible, but in any event by no later than the first Mon-
day in June, the new construction roll shall be certified to the county audi-
tor and a listing showing the amount of value on the new construction roll in
each taxing district or unit shall be forwarded to the state tax commission
on or before the fourth Monday in July. Provided however, the value shown
in subsection (3)(e) of this section shall be reported to the appropriate
county auditor by the state tax commission by the third Monday in July and the
value sent by the county auditor to each taxing district. The value estab-
lished pursuant to subsection (3)(e) of this section is subject to correc-
tion by the state tax commission until the first Monday in September, and any
such corrections shall be sent to the appropriate county auditor, who shall
notify any affected taxing districts.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the value shown on
the new construction roll shall include ninety percent (90%) of the taxable
market value increase from:
(a) Construction of any new structure that previously did not exist,
once it is completed and taxable;
(b) Additions or alterations to existing nonresidential structures;
(c) Installation of new or used manufactured housing that did not pre-
viously exist within the county;
(d) Property newly taxable as a result of loss of the exemption provided
by section 63-602W(3) or (4), Idaho Code;


(e) The construction of any improvement or installation of any equip-
ment used for or in conjunction with the generation of electricity and
the addition of any improvement or equipment intended to be so used, ex-
cept property that has a value allocated or apportioned pursuant to sec-
tion 63-405, Idaho Code, or that is owned by a cooperative or municipal-
ity as those terms are defined in section 61-332A, Idaho Code, or that
is owned by a public utility as that term is defined in section 61-332A,
Idaho Code, owning any other property that is allocated or apportioned.
No replacement equipment or improvements may be included;
(f) Provided such increases do not include increases already reported
on the new construction roll as permitted in paragraphs (i) and (j) of
this subsection, increases in value over the base value of property on
the base assessment roll within an urban renewal revenue allocation
area that has been terminated pursuant to section 50-2909(4) 50-2914,
Idaho Code, to the extent that this increment exceeds the incremental
value as of December 31, 2006, or, for revenue allocation areas formed
after December 31, 2006, eighty percent (80%) of the increment value.
Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, the new construction
roll shall not include new construction located within an urban renewal
district's revenue allocation area, except as provided in this para-
graph or paragraph (k) of this subsection;
(g) New construction, in any one (1) of the immediate five (5) tax years
preceding the current tax year, allowable but never included on a new
construction roll, provided however, that for such property the value
on the new construction roll shall reflect the taxable value that would
have been included on the new construction roll for the first year in
which the property should have been included;
(h) Formerly exempt improvements on state college-owned or state uni-
versity-owned land for student dining, housing, or other education-re-
lated purposes approved by the state board of education and board of
regents of the university of Idaho as proper for the operation of such
state college or university, provided such improvements were never in-
cluded on any previous new construction roll;
(i) Increases in base value when due to previously determined incre-
ment value added to the base value as required in sections 50-2903 and
50-2903A, Idaho Code, due to a modification of the urban renewal plan.
In this case, the amount added to the new construction roll will equal
eighty percent (80%) of the amount by which the increment value in the
year immediately preceding the year in which the base value adjustment
described in this subsection occurs exceeds the incremental value as of
December 31, 2006, or, for revenue allocation areas formed after Decem-
ber 31, 2006, the entire increment value; and
(j) Increases in base value when due to previously determined incre-
ment value added to the base value as a result of a de-annexation within
a revenue allocation area as defined in section 50-2903, Idaho Code.
In this case, the amount added to the new construction roll will equal
eighty percent (80%) of the amount by which the increment value in the
year immediately preceding the year in which the de-annexation de-
scribed in this subsection occurs exceeds the incremental value as of
December 31, 2006, or, for revenue allocation areas formed after Decem-


ber 31, 2006, the entire increment value within the area subject to the
de-annexation.
(k) In the case of a fire protection district or ambulance service
district that encompasses all or part of any urban renewal revenue
allocation area that such district withdrew from pursuant to section
50-2906(5), Idaho Code, eighty percent (80%) of the increment value may
be included on the new construction roll for the year in which the dis-
trict withdrew from such urban renewal revenue allocation area. Each
year thereafter, ninety percent (90%) of the taxable value of otherwise
qualifying new construction shall be included in the new construction
roll for such fire protection district or ambulance service district,
even if such new construction would not otherwise qualify because it was
located within a revenue allocation area.
(4) The amount of taxable market value of new construction shall be the
change in net taxable market value that is attributable directly to the new
construction or loss of the exemption provided by section 63-602W(3) or (4),
Idaho Code. It shall not include any change in value of existing property
that is due to external market forces such as general or localized inflation,
except as provided in subsection (3)(f) of this section.
(5) The amount of taxable market value of new construction shall not in-
clude any new construction of property that has been granted a provisional
property tax exemption, pursuant to section 63-1305C, Idaho Code. A prop-
erty owner may apply to the board of county commissioners, if an application
is required pursuant to section 63-602, Idaho Code, for an exemption from
property tax at the time the initial building permits are applied for or at
the time construction of the property has begun, whichever is earlier, or at
any time thereafter.
(6) The amount of taxable market value of new construction shall not in-
clude any new construction of property for which an exemption from sales and
use tax has been granted pursuant to section 63-3622VV, Idaho Code.
SECTION 9. That Section 63-802, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-802. LIMITATION ON BUDGET REQUESTS -- LIMITATION ON TAX CHARGES --
EXCEPTIONS. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, no taxing dis-
trict shall certify a budget request for an amount of property tax revenues
to finance an annual budget that exceeds the maximum sum permitted under this
section:
(a)(i) The highest dollar amount of property taxes certified for
its annual budget for any one (1) of the three (3) tax years preced-
ing the current tax year, which amount may be increased by a growth
factor of not to exceed three percent (3%) plus the amount of rev-
enue calculated as described in this subsection. The taxing dis-
trict shall determine what portion of the three percent (3%) in-
crease permitted under this subparagraph that it requires and then
calculate a preliminary levy rate based on the percent chosen. In
calculating the preliminary levy rate, the most current taxable
market value shall be used, except that for taxable market values
of centrally assessed operating property, the prior year's valua-
tion may be used instead of the current year's taxable market val-


ues. The preliminary levy rate shall be multiplied by the value
shown on the new construction roll compiled pursuant to section
63-301A, Idaho Code, and by ninety percent (90%) of the value of
annexation during the previous calendar year, as certified by the
state tax commission for taxable market values of operating prop-
erty of public utilities and by the county assessor; except for a
fire protection district annexing property prior to July 1, 2021,
pursuant to section 31-1429, Idaho Code, the new levy rate shall be
multiplied by one hundred percent (100%) of the value of any such
property annexed prior to July 1, 2021.
(ii) The total budget increase calculated under this paragraph
must not exceed eight percent (8%), except that any increase in the
amount of property tax revenue to finance an annual budget added
as a result of the termination, deannexation, or plan modification
of, or the withdrawal of certain taxing districts from, a revenue
allocation area of an urban renewal district pursuant to section
63-301A(3)(g), (j), or (k),(3)(f), (i), (j), or (k), Idaho Code,
or section 50-2908(1)(g), Idaho Code, shall not be subject to such
limitation.
(iii) Following the first year in which a fire protection district
has annexed city property pursuant to section 31-1429, Idaho Code,
the city shall subtract an amount equal to the moneys spent on fire
protection services during the last full year the city provided
fire protection services to its residents from its budget limita-
tion under this section.
(b) If the taxing district has not imposed a levy for three (3) or more
years, the highest dollar amount of property taxes certified for its an-
nual budget for the purpose of paragraph (a)(i) of this subsection shall
be the dollar amount of property taxes certified for its annual budget
during the last year in which a levy was made.
(c) The dollar amount of the actual budget request may be substituted
for the amount in paragraph (a) of this subsection if the taxing dis-
trict is newly created, except as may be provided in paragraph (i) of
this subsection.
(d) This section does not apply to school district levies imposed in
section 33-802, Idaho Code.
(e)(i) In the case of a nonschool district for which less than the
maximum allowable increase in the dollar amount of property taxes
is certified for annual budget purposes in any one (1) year, such a
district may, in any following year, recover the forgone increase
by certifying, in addition to any increase otherwise allowed, any
or all of the increase originally forgone. Provided however, that
prior to budgeting any forgone increase, the district must provide
notice of its intent to do so, hold a public hearing that may be in
conjunction with its annual budget hearing, and certify by resolu-
tion the amount of forgone increase to be budgeted and the specific
purpose for which the forgone increase is being budgeted. Upon
adoption of the resolution, the clerk of the district shall file a
copy of the resolution with the county clerk and the state tax com-
mission. Said additional amount shall be included in future cal-


culations for increases as allowed, except as provided in subpara-
graph (iii) of this paragraph.
(ii) If the forgone increase is budgeted for the purpose of main-
tenance and operations, the rate of recovering the reserved for-
gone moneys may increase the taxing district's budget by no more
than one percent (1%) per year.
(iii) If the forgone increase is budgeted for a capital project or
projects, the rate of recovering the reserved forgone moneys may
not exceed three percent (3%) of the taxing district's budget for
the year in which the forgone increase is budgeted. Forgone moneys
budgeted for a capital project must be deducted from the taxing
district's forgone balance in the year in which it is budgeted.
Upon completion of such a capital project, the taxing district
shall certify such completion to the state tax commission and
county clerk. If, upon certification, the state tax commission
finds that the taxing district included forgone moneys for a capi-
tal project in calculating the increase permitted under paragraph
(a) of this subsection, the state tax commission shall direct the
taxing district to reduce its property tax budget for any year
in which the forgone moneys were used to calculate a budget in-
crease, in an amount equal to the forgone moneys budgeted plus any
increases attributed to the forgone moneys improperly included in
the taxing district's property tax budget. For the purpose of this
paragraph, a capital project includes:
1. The construction, expansion, renovation, or replacement
of public facilities, including the acquisition of land and
other site improvements;
2. The construction, expansion, or reconstruction of public
works improvements, including roads, bridges, water sys-
tems, sewer systems, and broadband systems; and
3. The purchase of equipment with a useful life of ten (10)
years or more.
(f) If a taxing district elects to budget less than the maximum allow-
able increase in the dollar amount of property taxes, the taxing dis-
trict may reserve the right to recover all or any portion of that year's
forgone increase in a subsequent year by adoption of a resolution spec-
ifying the dollar amount of property taxes being reserved. Otherwise,
that year's forgone increase may not be recovered under paragraph (e) of
this subsection. The district must provide notice of its intent to do so
and hold a public hearing that may be in conjunction with its annual bud-
get hearing, if applicable. The resolution to reserve the right to re-
cover the forgone increase for that year shall be adopted at the annual
budget hearing of the taxing district if the district has a budget hear-
ing requirement.
(g) In the case of cities, if the immediately preceding year's levy sub-
ject to the limitation provided by this section is less than 0.004, the
city may increase its budget by an amount not to exceed the difference
between 0.004 and the actual prior year's levy multiplied by the prior
year's market value for assessment purposes. The additional amount
must be approved by sixty percent (60%) of the voters voting on the ques-


tion at an election called for that purpose and held on the date in May or
November provided by law and may be included in the annual budget of the
city for purposes of this section.
(h) A taxing district may submit to the electors within the district
the question of whether the budget from property tax revenues may be
increased beyond the amount authorized in this section, but not beyond
the levy authorized by statute. The additional amount must be approved
by sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66 2/3%) or more of the voters
voting on the question at an election called for that purpose and held
on the May or November dates provided by section 34-106, Idaho Code.
If approved by the required minimum sixty-six and two-thirds percent
(66 2/3%) of the voters voting at the election, the new budget amount
shall be the base budget for the purposes of this section.
(i) When a nonschool district consolidates with another nonschool
district or dissolves and a new district performing similar governmen-
tal functions as the dissolved district forms with the same boundaries
within three (3) years, the maximum amount of a budget of the district
from property tax revenues shall not be greater than the sum of the
amounts that would have been authorized by this section for the district
itself or for the districts that were consolidated or dissolved and in-
corporated into a new district.
(j) This section does not apply to cooperative service agency levies
imposed in sections 33-317 and 33-317A, Idaho Code.
(k) The amount of money received in the twelve (12) months immediately
preceding June 30 of the current tax year as a result of distributions of
the tax provided in section 63-3502B(2), Idaho Code.
(2) In the case of fire districts, during the year immediately follow-
ing the election of a public utility or public utilities to consent to be pro-
vided fire protection pursuant to section 31-1425, Idaho Code, the maximum
amount of property tax revenues permitted in subsection (1) of this section
may be increased by an amount equal to the current year's taxable value of the
consenting public utility or public utilities multiplied by that portion of
the prior year's levy subject to the limitation provided by subsection (1) of
this section.
(3) No board of county commissioners shall set a levy, nor shall the
state tax commission approve a levy for annual budget purposes, which ex-
ceeds the limitation imposed in subsection (1) of this section unless au-
thority to exceed such limitation has been approved by a majority of the tax-
ing district's electors voting on the question at an election called for that
purpose and held pursuant to section 34-106, Idaho Code, provided however,
that such voter approval shall be for a period of not to exceed two (2) years.
(4) The amount of property tax revenues to finance an annual budget does
not include revenues from nonproperty tax sources and does not include rev-
enue from levies for the payment of judicially confirmed obligations pur-
suant to sections 63-1315 and 63-1316, Idaho Code, and revenue from levies
that are voter-approved for bonds, override levies or supplemental levies,
plant facilities reserve fund levies, school emergency fund levies, or for
levies applicable to newly annexed property or for levies applicable to new
construction as evidenced by the value of property subject to the occupancy
tax pursuant to section 63-317, Idaho Code, for the preceding tax year. The


amount of property tax revenues to finance an annual budget does not include
any property taxes that were collected and refunded on property that is ex-
empt from taxation, pursuant to section 63-1305C, Idaho Code.
(5) The amount of property tax revenues to finance an annual budget
shall include moneys received as recovery of property tax for a revoked pro-
visional property tax exemption under section 63-1305C, Idaho Code.
(6) For tax year 2023, before calculating the amount required in sub-
section (1)(a)(i) of this section, the board of county commissioners shall
reduce the approved property tax levy portion of its budget for the immedi-
ate prior three (3) years in an amount equal to the amount levied for indigent
public defense. The reduced budget amount shall be the base budget for the
purpose of subsection (1)(a)(i) of this section.
SECTION 10. That Section 63-803, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-803. CERTIFICATION OF BUDGETS IN DOLLARS. (1) Whenever any taxing
district is required by law to certify to any county treasurer, county au-
ditor, county assessor, county commissioners, or other county officer any
property tax levy on property located within said district, such certifica-
tion shall, notwithstanding any other provision of the law applicable to any
such district, be made at the time and in the manner hereinafter provided.
(2) The county auditor shall inform each of the taxing districts within
his county of the taxable value of that district as soon as such value is
known to the auditor, whether the value comes from the appraisal and assess-
ment of real and personal property, from allocation of the taxable value of
operating property, or from other sources.
(3) Using the taxable value of the district, the council, trustees,
board, or other governing body of any taxing district shall certify the to-
tal amount required from a property tax upon property within the district
to raise the amount of money fixed by its budget as previously prepared or
approved. The amount of money so determined shall be certified in dollars
to the appropriate county commissioners. Any taxing unit, except regional
airport authorities, located in more than one (1) county shall divide its
dollar budget for certification to the separate counties by multiplying the
amount of such budget by a fraction, the numerator of which shall be the total
taxable value of all property in such taxing unit within the county to which
such certification is to be made, and the denominator of which shall be the
total taxable value of property in such taxing unit in all such counties.
Budget certification to the participating counties of regional airport
authorities shall be made in the manner prescribed in section 21-807(10),
Idaho Code. Taxable value shall be certified by the county auditor of each
affected county to such taxing unit and such certification shall be used in
this formula. Except as provided in section 33-805, Idaho Code, relating to
school emergency fund levies, the certification to the county commissioners
required in this section shall be made not later than the Thursday prior
to the second Monday in September, unless, upon application therefor, the
county commissioners grant an extension of not more than seven (7) working
days. After receipt of this certification, the county commissioners shall
make a tax levy as a percent of taxable value of all property in the taxing


district which, when applied to the tax rolls, will meet the budget require-
ments certified by such taxing districts.
(4) Except as provided in section 50-2908(1), Idaho Code, for the pur-
pose of this section, "taxable value" shall mean the portion of the equal-
ized assessed value, less any exemptions, not including the additional ex-
emption provided for tax year 2022 in section 63-602KK(2)(b), Idaho Code,
and the value that exceeds the value of the base assessment roll for the por-
tion of any taxing district within a revenue allocation area of an urban re-
newal district, located within each taxing district that certifies a budget
to be raised from a property tax levy. When the county auditor is notified
of revenues sufficient to cover expenses as provided in section 50-2903(5)
50-2914, Idaho Code, taxable value shall also include the value that exceeds
the value of the base assessment roll for the portion of any taxing district
within a revenue allocation area. For each taxing district, taxable value
shall include the value from the property and operating property rolls for
the current year and subsequent and missed property rolls for the prior year
or the best estimate of the subsequent and missed property rolls for the cur-
rent year.
(5) At the time of certifying to the county commissioners the amount re-
quired from a property tax under subsection (3) of this section, any taxing
district with one (1) or more voter-approved bonds and levies shall submit to
the appropriate county tax collector the expiration date of each voter-ap-
proved bond and levy applicable to the taxing district.
SECTION 11. That Section 63-1312, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-1312. MUNICIPAL PROPERTY TAXES -- NOTIFICATION OF VALUATION. (1)
Prior to the fourth Monday of March of the current year the county auditor
must notify every taxing district or authority, other than school districts,
of the total taxable valuation of all the taxable property situated within
such districts for the preceding calendar year for the purpose of assisting
such governing authorities in their determination of tax rates to be levied
for the current year and other informational purposes.
(2) Prior to the first Monday in August the auditor of each county in
the state shall notify the state tax commission and the clerk of each taxing
unit in his county of the taxable valuation of all the taxable property situ-
ated within that taxing district from the property roll for the current year,
from the operating property roll for the previous year, from the prior year's
actual or current year's estimated subsequent property roll and missed prop-
erty roll, and the amount of value subject to occupancy tax notwithstanding
exemptions authorized in chapter 6, title 63, Idaho Code, for the previous
year.
(3) The auditor shall furnish the valuation from the current operating
property roll upon receipt from the state tax commission.
(4) Subsequent to the notification of the county auditor of revenues
sufficient to cover expenses as provided in section 50-2903(5) 50-2914,
Idaho Code, taxable value as used in this section shall also include the
value that exceeds the value of the base assessment roll for the portion of
any taxing district within a revenue allocation area.


SECTION 12. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval, and retroactively to January 1, 2025.